Georgia statutes. TITLE 38 Military, Emergency Management, and Veterans Affairs
Article 2 Organization and Administration
38-3-27.
Local organizations for emergency management; creation; structure; powers; directors; appointment, qualifications, and compensation; state to provide financial assistance; entitlement for funding.

The governing body of each county of this state may establish a local organization for emergency management in accordance with the state emergency management plan and program. If a county fails to establish an organization for emergency management in accordance with the state emergency management plan and program, any municipality in such county may establish its own organization for emergency management. In cases where a county has an organization for emergency management, such organization shall include participation by each city within the county unless the governing authority of any particular city elects to implement its own organization for emergency management. Any two or more of the above-mentioned political subdivisions may, with the approval of the director, contract with each other so as to form one emergency management organization for the entire area included in the bounds of the contracting political subdivisions. The executive officer or governing body of the political subdivision is authorized to nominate a local director to the director of emergency management who shall have the authority to make the appointment. The local director shall have direct responsibility for the organization, administration, and operation of the local organization for emergency management, subject to the direction and control of the executive officer or governing body and shall serve at the pleasure of such executive officer or governing body. Each local organization for emergency management shall perform emergency management functions within the territorial limits of the political subdivision within which it is organized and, in addition, shall conduct such functions outside of such territorial limits as may be required pursuant to Article 1, this article, and Article 3 of this chapter.

A local director appointed pursuant to the provisions of paragraph (1) of this subsection who is paid a salary for full-time service as a director by the political subdivision or political subdivisions shall have the following minimum qualifications:

The director shall be at least 21 years of age;

The director shall not have been convicted of a felony. The executive officer or governing body of a political subdivision which nominates a local director shall furnish the director of emergency management two sets of fingerprints of the nominee. The director of emergency management shall forward fingerprints received concerning each nominee to the Georgia Crime Information Center of the Georgia Bureau of Investigation for the purpose of criminal identification through the fingerprint system of identification established by the Georgia Bureau of Investigation and the fingerprint system of identification established by the Federal Bureau of Investigation. The Georgia Crime Information Center shall report the findings of its records search and the records search of the Federal Bureau of Investigation to the director of emergency management;

The director shall have completed a high school education or its equivalent and shall have successfully completed all initial courses required by the director of emergency management within 180 days following the date of nomination to office or within an extended period as determined by the director of emergency management and shall have successfully completed subsequent courses required by the director of emergency management within an appropriate period as determined by the director of emergency management;

The director shall be capable of writing plans for responding to and recovering from disasters in his jurisdiction and shall be routinely available to respond to emergency scenes, command posts, or operation centers; to coordinate emergency response of public and private agencies and organizations; to attend training; and to attend meetings convened by the appointing authority or the director of emergency management; and

The director shall not be self-employed or have any other occupation in the private sector which conflicts with his duties as a local director.

If a local director appointed pursuant to the provisions of paragraph (1) of this subsection is a part-time director, such part-time director shall meet the minimum qualifications in subparagraphs (A) through (D) of paragraph (2) of this subsection. If such local director is employed under a 40 to 90 percent (time required on job) work contract, such local director shall be required to devote at least 80 hours per month on emergency management matters but not more than 30 hours in any one week during normal business hours of other county offices. If such local director is employed under a 25 to 39 percent (time required on job) work contract, such local director shall be required to devote at least 40 hours per month on emergency management matters but not more than 15 hours in any one week during normal business hours of other county offices.

If the part-time paid director is also a part-time paid employee of the federal or state government, he must have written authorization from the appropriate appointing authority to hold the position of director and to comply with the provisions of subparagraph (A) of this paragraph and subparagraph (D) of paragraph (2) of this subsection.

If the part-time paid director is also a part-time paid employee of county or municipal government in another capacity, that government must enact an order or ordinance specifying that such director will be permitted to comply with the provisions of subparagraph (A) of this paragraph and subparagraph (D) of paragraph (2) of this subsection. The order or ordinance shall also specify that the individual, when acting as director, shall relinquish authorities and responsibilities associated with his other governmental employment and shall name a person to assume those authorities and responsibilities until such time as the director shall cease to function as director. In no case shall the county or municipal government seek or receive any reimbursement for the part-time paid director’s salary if such director is employed and compensated by the county or municipality in another capacity.

If the part-time paid director is also a part-time paid employee in the private sector, he shall have a letter from his employer stating that he shall, without penalty, be permitted to comply with the provisions of subparagraph (A) of this paragraph and subparagraph (D) of paragraph (2) of this subsection.

If the part-time paid director is self-employed, he must certify, by letter, that his schedule shall permit him to comply with the provisions of subparagraph (A) of this paragraph and subparagraph (D) of paragraph (2) of this subsection.

Except as provided in this subparagraph, any director or deputy director of a local emergency management organization appointed after July 1, 1999, shall be a certified emergency manager under the Georgia Emergency Management and Homeland Security Agency’s Certified Emergency Manager Program. The curriculum of the Certified Emergency Manager Program and requirements for certification shall be determined by the director of emergency management and homeland security and shall include, but not be limited to, professional development series training, independent study courses, emergency preparedness courses, and field-delivered courses. Certification may be obtained by an appointed director or deputy director within six months of his or her appointment. Certification shall expire biennially. As a condition of certification renewal, such emergency management personnel shall be required to satisfactorily complete continuing education requirements provided for in subparagraph (G) of this paragraph.

Emergency management personnel certified under the Certified Emergency Manager Program shall complete annually a minimum of 24 hours of continuing education to maintain certification. The continuing education shall include programs and courses sponsored or approved by the director of emergency management. Personnel who lose their certification because of their failure to meet continuing education requirements will be eligible for recertification under provisions included in the Certified Emergency Manager Program.

If a political subdivision has a volunteer director, the political subdivision shall furnish assistance to enable the volunteer director to carry out his duties outlined in this article and Article 3 of this chapter.

The political subdivision shall designate an office in a building owned or leased by the political subdivision as the office of emergency management. Such office of emergency management shall have appropriate equipment and supplies, including but not limited to telephone and communication equipment, access to the 9-1-1 system if such system is operational in the political subdivision, desks, typewriters, file cabinets, and necessary office supplies. No such equipment or supplies shall be used for personal business. The local director shall post on the front door of the office the schedule of hours of the work week in which he will be attending to emergency management matters. The citizens of a political subdivision shall have accessibility to the office of emergency management and the local director or his designee shall be available or on call at all times beyond working hours.

A local director whose salary is reimbursed in part or in full by the Georgia Emergency Management and Homeland Security Agency shall also meet all requirements which may be imposed by the federal emergency management agency or its successor.

A local director who no longer meets the qualifications or complies with the requirements of this subsection may be removed by the director of emergency management. In any case where a local director is removed pursuant to this paragraph, the executive officer or governing body of the political subdivision shall nominate another local director.

Each political subdivision shall have the power and authority:

To appropriate and expend funds, to execute contracts, and to obtain and distribute equipment, materials, and supplies for emergency management purposes;

To provide for the health and safety of persons and property, including emergency assistance to the victims of any emergency or disaster resulting from manmade or natural causes or enemy attack and to direct and coordinate the development of emergency management plans and programs in accordance with the policies and plans set by the federal and state emergency management agencies;

To appoint, employ, remove, or provide, with or without compensation, chiefs of services, warning personnel, rescue teams, auxiliary fire and police personnel, and other emergency management workers;

To establish a primary and one or more secondary control centers to serve as command posts during an emergency or disaster;

Subject to the order of the Governor or the chief executive of the political subdivision, to assign and make available for duty the employees, property, or equipment of the subdivision relating to fire-fighting, engineering, rescue, health, medical, and related services and to police, transportation, construction, and similar items or services for emergency management purposes, within or outside of the physical limits of the subdivision; and

In addition to the heretofore stated powers and authorities, to acquire, temporarily or permanently, by purchase, lease, or otherwise, sites required for installation of temporary housing units for disaster victims; and to enter into whatever arrangements, including purchase, of temporary housing units and payment of transportation charges which are necessary to prepare or equip such sites to utilize the housing units.

There is created a state fund to provide assistance to local organizations for emergency management which are authorized by subsections (a) and (b) of this Code section. The fund shall be used for the purpose of making grants to local emergency management organizations to enable them to purchase or otherwise obtain equipment which is needed for disaster preparedness. The fund shall be administered by the director of emergency management who, by rules and regulations, shall establish uniform criteria governing application for and the use of funds granted to local organizations for emergency management pursuant to this subsection. The rules and regulations shall include, but shall not be limited to, provisions:

Requiring that, as a condition precedent to receiving a state grant pursuant to this subsection, an amount equal to the state grant shall be raised from local funds for the purchase of disaster preparedness equipment;

Defining disaster preparedness equipment which shall qualify for purchase by the use of matching funds made available pursuant to this subsection;

Establishing procedures and requirements governing the purchase of disaster preparedness equipment when matching funds made available pursuant to this subsection are used for the purchase;

Establishing priorities governing grants made pursuant to this subsection which shall be based on the most effective and efficient use of disaster preparedness equipment purchased with matching funds made available pursuant to this subsection;

Establishing forms, procedures, and requirements governing applications for grants pursuant to this subsection; and

Prohibiting any single local emergency management organization from receiving more than 12 1/2 percent of the total funds annually appropriated to carry out this subsection.

The funds necessary to carry out subsection (c) of this Code section shall come from funds specifically appropriated for such purpose by the General Assembly.

To the extent funds are appropriated for such purpose by the General Assembly, the director of emergency management is authorized and directed to provide funds to counties or municipalities which operate a local emergency management organization as required by this Code section. No county or municipality shall be entitled to receive funds unless the local emergency management organization has met all of the state and federal requirements to be an emergency management organization qualified to receive federal funds, including:

Legal establishment by local ordinance or resolution;

A legally appointed local director who has been endorsed and approved by the state director of emergency management and appointed by the Governor;

An approved emergency and disaster plan with all applicable annexes; and

An approved fiscal year program paper and other necessary compliance documents.

The amount provided to each county or municipality shall be equal to the amount of any shortfall in federal funding which results in federal funds which less than match (on a 50 percent=ndash50 percent basis) the amount budgeted by the county or municipality for the purpose of operating and maintaining the local emergency management organization.

In the event sufficient state funds other than those from federal sources are not appropriated for a fiscal year to fund the full amount provided for in paragraph (2) of this subsection, then the amount which would otherwise be payable to each county and municipality shall be reduced pro rata on the basis of the funds actually appropriated.

The director of emergency management is authorized and directed to adopt and promulgate appropriate rules and regulations to carry out this subsection.

Funds to carry out this subsection shall come from funds appropriated to the Office of Planning and Budget specifically for the purposes of carrying out this subsection.

After December 31, 1993, any county which fails at any time to have established a local organization for emergency management in accordance with the state emergency management plan and program shall not be entitled to any state funding for disaster relief assistance.

After December 31, 1993, if a county has an organization for emergency management but a municipality within the county is not a part of the county’s organization or plan and fails to have in place a local organization for emergency management in accordance with the state emergency management plan and program, such municipality shall not be entitled to any state funding for disaster relief assistance.

History.

Ga. L. 1951, p. 224, § 9; Ga. L. 1963, p. 473, § 1; Ga. L. 1973, p. 74, § 6; Ga. L. 1975, p. 1262, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 1247, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 389, § 2; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1802, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 38; Ga. L. 1991, p. 654, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 38; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1258, §§ 5, 6; Ga. L. 1999, p. 372, § 3; Ga. L. 2005, p. 660, § 8/HB 470; Ga. L. 2009, p. 8, § 38/SB 46; Ga. L. 2016, p. 91, § 9/SB 416.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1999, “this” was substituted for “his” in the first sentence of subparagraph (a)(3)(F).

38-3-28.
Authority of political subdivisions; filing of orders, rules, and regulations; effect; consideration of federal emergency management regulations.

The political subdivisions of the state and other agencies designated or appointed by the Governor are authorized and empowered to make, amend, and rescind such orders, rules, and regulations as may be necessary for emergency management purposes and to supplement the carrying out of Articles 1 through 3 of this chapter, but not inconsistent with any orders, rules, or regulations promulgated by the Governor or by any state agency exercising a power delegated to it by him.

All orders, rules, and regulations promulgated by the Governor, or by any political subdivision or other agency authorized by Articles 1 through 3 of this chapter to make orders, rules, and regulations, shall have the full force and effect of law when, in the event of issuance by the Governor or any state agency, a copy thereof is filed in the office of the Secretary of State or, if promulgated by a political subdivision of the state or agency thereof, when filed in the office of the clerk of the political subdivision or agency promulgating the same. All laws, ordinances, rules, and regulations inconsistent with Articles 1 through 3 of this chapter, or of any order, rule, or regulation issued under the authority of Articles 1 through 3 of this chapter, shall be suspended during the period of time and to the extent that the conflict exists.

In order to attain uniformity so far as practicable throughout the country in measures taken to aid emergency management, all action taken under Articles 1 through 3 of this chapter and all orders, rules, and regulations made pursuant thereto shall be taken or made with due consideration to the orders, rules, regulations, actions, recommendations, and requests of federal authorities relevant thereto and, to the extent permitted by law, shall be consistent with such orders, rules, regulations, actions, recommendations, and requests.

History.

Ga. L. 1951, p. 224, § 15; Ga. L. 1981, p. 389, § 2.

38-3-29.
Local mutual aid arrangements; out-of-state arrangements; conformity with state plan.

The director of each local organization for emergency management, in collaboration with other public and private agencies within this state, may develop or cause to be developed mutual aid arrangements for reciprocal emergency management aid and assistance in case of emergency or disaster too great to be dealt with unassisted. The arrangements shall be consistent with the state emergency management plan and program, and in time of emergency it shall be the duty of each local organization for emergency management to render assistance in accordance with the mutual aid arrangements.

The director of each local organization for emergency management, subject to the approval of the Governor, may enter into mutual aid arrangements with emergency management agencies or organizations in other states for reciprocal emergency management aid and assistance in case of emergency or disaster too great to be dealt with unassisted.

History.

Ga. L. 1951, p. 224, § 8; Ga. L. 1973, p. 74, § 5; Ga. L. 1981, p. 389, § 1.

38-3-30.
Aid rendered by local employees to other political subdivisions; reimbursement of personnel and equipment expenses by aided locality; procedure.

Whenever the employees of any political subdivision are rendering outside aid pursuant to the authority contained in Code Section 38-3-27, the employees shall have the same powers, duties, rights, privileges, and immunities as if they were performing their duties in the political subdivisions in which they are normally employed.

The political subdivision in which any equipment is used pursuant to this Code section shall be liable for any loss or damage thereto and shall pay any expense incurred in the operation and maintenance thereof. No claim for the loss, damage, or expense shall be allowed unless, within 60 days after the same is sustained or incurred, an itemized notice of the claim under oath is served by mail or otherwise upon the chief fiscal officer of the political subdivision where the equipment was used. The political subdivision which is aided pursuant to this Code section shall also pay and reimburse the political subdivision furnishing the aid for the compensation paid to employees furnished under this Code section during the time of the rendition of the aid and shall defray the actual traveling and maintenance expenses of the employees while they are rendering the aid. The reimbursement shall include any amounts paid or due for compensation due to personal injury or death while the employees are engaged in rendering the aid. The term “employee,” as used in this Code section, shall mean, and this Code section shall apply with equal effect to, paid, volunteer, and auxiliary employees and emergency management workers.

The foregoing rights, privileges, and obligations shall also apply in the event such aid is rendered outside the state, provided that payment or reimbursement in such case shall or may be made by the state or political subdivision receiving the aid pursuant to a reciprocal mutual-aid agreement or compact with the state or by the federal government.

History.

Ga. L. 1951, p. 224, § 10; Ga. L. 1981, p. 389, § 2.

38-3-31.
Authority of state and localities to accept gifts, grants, or loans, from federal or private sources.

Whenever the federal government or any agency or officer thereof offers to the state, or through the state to any political subdivision thereof, services, equipment, supplies, materials, or funds by way of gift, grant, or loan for purposes of emergency management, the state, acting through the Governor, or the political subdivision acting with the consent of the Governor and through its executive officer or governing body, may accept the offer. Upon the acceptance the Governor of the state or executive officer or governing body of the political subdivision may authorize any officer of the state or of the political subdivision, as the case may be, to receive the service, equipment, supplies, materials, or funds on behalf of the state or the political subdivision, subject to the terms of the offer and the rules and regulations, if any, of the agency making the offer.

Whenever any person, firm, or corporation offers to the state or to any political subdivision thereof services, equipment, supplies, materials, or funds by way of gift, grant, or loan for purpose of emergency management, the state, acting through the Governor, or the political subdivision acting through its executive officer or governing body, may accept the offer. Upon the acceptance the Governor of the state or executive officer or governing body of the political subdivision may authorize any officer of the state or of the political subdivision, as the case may be, to receive the services, equipment, supplies, materials, or funds on behalf of the state or the political subdivision, subject to the terms of the offer.

History.

Ga. L. 1951, p. 224, § 18; Ga. L. 1981, p. 389, § 2.

38-3-32.
Sovereign immunity granted those who allow premises to be used for emergency management purposes; when.

When any person, firm, or corporation owning or controlling any real estate or other premises authorizes and permits any emergency management agency, board, or other authority of this state or of any political subdivision of this state to use the premises without charge therefor for the purpose of sheltering persons during an actual or practice emergency or disaster as contemplated by Articles 1 through 3 of this chapter, the person, firm, or corporation, at such times and for such periods during which the premises are occupied and actually employed for purpose of emergency management, shall be clothed with the sovereign immunity of the state. No civil action shall be brought or maintained against any such person, firm, or corporation to recover damages for personal injuries or death of any person while on the premises during an actual or practice emergency, disaster, or enemy attack, or for the loss or destruction of personal property brought upon the premises by any person seeking shelter thereon during an actual or practice emergency or disaster.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 354, § 1; Ga. L. 1974, p. 386, § 1.

38-3-33.
Immunity granted those who provide equipment in emergencies.

Any person, including anyone in the business of selling or leasing new or used equipment, who provides equipment to the state or to any political subdivision of the state at no cost during an emergency or disaster situation, whether or not officially declared as such, for use in meeting any exigency caused by the emergency or disaster situation shall not be liable for any civil damages as a result of any act or omission by the person in providing the equipment.

History.

Ga. L. 1980, p. 1048, § 1.

38-3-34.
Emergency management personnel; qualifications; oath; who may administer.

No person shall be employed or associated in any capacity in any emergency management organization established under Articles 1 through 3 of this chapter who advocates a change by force or violence in the constitutional form of the government of the United States or in this state or the overthrow of any government in the United States by force or violence; or who has been convicted of or is under indictment or accusation charging any subversive act against the United States.

Before entering upon his duties, each person who is appointed to serve in an organization for emergency management shall take an oath in writing before a person authorized to administer oaths in this state, which oath shall be substantially as follows:

“I
_______________ , do solemnly swear (or affirm) that I will support and defend the Constitution of the United States and the Constitution of the State of Georgia, against all enemies, foreign and domestic; that I will bear true faith and allegiance to the same; that I take this obligation freely, without any mental reservation or purpose of evasion; and that I will well and faithfully discharge the duties upon which I am about to enter.

I do further swear (or affirm) that I do not advocate, nor am I a member of any political party or organization that advocates, the overthrow of the government of the United States or of this state by force or violence; and that during such time as I am a member of the (name of emergency management organization) I will not advocate nor become a member of any political party or organization that advocates the overthrow of the government of the United States or of this state by force or violence.”

For the purposes of Articles 1 through 3 of this chapter only, the executive heads of local organizations for emergency management and their duly appointed deputies and assistants are authorized to administer oaths to emergency management personnel.

History.

Ga. L. 1951, p. 224, §§ 19, 20; Ga. L. 1981, p. 389, § 2; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 38.

38-3-35.
Immunity of state and political subdivisions; of emergency management workers.

Neither the state nor any political subdivision of the state, nor the agents or representatives of the state or any political subdivision thereof, shall be liable for personal injury or property damage sustained by any person appointed or acting as a volunteer emergency management worker or member of any agency engaged in emergency management activity. The foregoing shall not affect the right of any person to receive benefits or compensation to which he might otherwise be entitled under Chapter 9 of Title 34, Code Section 38-3-30, any pension law, or any act of Congress.

Neither the state nor any political subdivision of the state nor, except in cases of willful misconduct, gross negligence, or bad faith, the employees, agents, or representatives of the state or any political subdivision thereof, nor any volunteer or auxiliary emergency management worker or member of any agency engaged in any emergency management activity complying with or reasonably attempting to comply with Articles 1 through 3 of this chapter; or any order, rule, or regulation promulgated pursuant to Articles 1 through 3 of this chapter, or pursuant to any ordinance relating to precautionary measures enacted by any political provisions of Articles 1 through 3 of this chapter, or pursuant to any ordinance relating to precautionary measures enacted by any political subdivision of the state shall be liable for the death of or the injury to person or for damage to property as a result of any such activity.

History.

Ga. L. 1951, p. 224, § 17; Ga. L. 1973, p. 74, § 8; Ga. L. 1981, p. 389, § 2; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 38.

Cross references.

Liability of law enforcement officers performing duties at scenes of emergencies, §

35-1-7

.

Liability of members of fire departments for acts performed while fighting fires or performed at scenes of emergencies, § 51-1-30.

Editor’s notes.

For application of this statute in 2020, see Executive Orders 04.14.20.01, 04.20.20.01, and 05.12.20.02.

A listing of Executive Orders issued in 2020 can be found at https://gov.georgia.gov/executive-action/executive-orders/2020-executive-orders.

38-3-36.
Director to license nongovernmental rescue organizations; exception; registration of public and private search and rescue dog teams.

Except as otherwise provided by subsection (b) of this Code section, all nongovernmental rescue organizations, associations, groups, teams, search and rescue dog teams, or individuals, whether or not they are holders of a charter issued by this state or officers thereof, shall be prohibited from performing any rescue or emergency management type activity until the organization, association, group, team, search and rescue dog team, or individual has been licensed by the director of emergency management to perform the activities. It is expressly declared that Articles 1 through 3 of this chapter shall not amend, repeal, alter, or affect in any manner Code Section 51-1-29.

Any marine rescue squadron sponsored by and operating under the direction and control of the sheriff of the county of residence of the squadron and chartered as a Marine Rescue Squadron of America, which was so chartered on January 1, 1960, or prior to that date, and which performs only water or boat safety rescue missions within this state, shall be deemed to be a governmental rescue organization within the meaning of subsection (a) of this Code section and need not be licensed by the director of emergency management as provided in the subsection.

The director of emergency management shall promulgate rules and regulations for training and licensing standards for private search and rescue dog teams. The director shall maintain a registry of public and private search and rescue dog teams operating within the state. Any public or private organization which provides rescue services in this state utilizing search and rescue dog teams shall register with the director the name and address of the organization, a 24 hour telephone number to be used for contact during emergencies, the counties in which the search and rescue dog teams provide service, the types of specialized search and rescue dog teams which are available, and such other information as the director may require by rule and regulation.

History.

Ga. L. 1973, p. 74, § 14; Ga. L. 1974, p. 558, § 2; Ga. L. 1976, p. 1590, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1600, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 389, § 2; Ga. L. 2000, p. 449, § 1.

38-3-37.
Prohibited actions by government official or employee during declared state of emergency.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Firearm” means any handgun, rifle, shotgun, or similar device or weapon which will or can be converted to expel a projectile by the action of an explosive or electrical charge.

“License holder” shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section 16-11-125.1.

“Weapon” shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section 16-11-125.1.

No official or employee of the state or any political subdivision thereof, member of the National Guard in the service of the state, or any person operating pursuant to or under color of state law, while acting during or pursuant to a declared state of emergency, shall:

Temporarily or permanently seize, or authorize the seizure of, any firearm or ammunition or any component thereof the possession of which was not prohibited by law at the time immediately prior to the declaration of a state of emergency, other than as provided by the criminal or forfeiture laws of this state;

Prohibit possession of any firearm or ammunition or any component thereof or promulgate any rule, regulation, or order prohibiting possession of any firearm or ammunition or any component thereof if such possession was not otherwise prohibited by law at the time immediately prior to the declaration of a state of emergency;

Prohibit any license holder from carrying any weapon or promulgate any rule, regulation, or order prohibiting such carrying if such carrying was not otherwise prohibited by law at the time immediately prior to the declaration of a state of emergency; or

Require the registration of any firearm.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-3-37

, enacted by Ga. L. 2014, p. 599, § 2-2/HB 60.

Cross references.

Right to Keep and Bear Arms, US Const., amend. 2.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2014, p. 599, § 1-1/HB 60, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Safe Carry Protection Act.’ ”

Ga. L. 2014, p. 599, § 2-1/HB 60, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This part shall be known to be in honor of Representative Bobby Franklin.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2014 enactment of this Code section, see 31 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 47 (2014).

38-3-38.
Entrance upon private property by Department of Corrections personnel during state of emergency or disaster.

During any state of emergency or state of disaster declared by the Governor pursuant to Code Section 38-3-51, Department of Corrections personnel and individuals in their custody and subject to their direction shall be authorized to enter upon private property following such declaration to the extent necessary for property protection, debris removal, restoration of services, and infrastructure repair and relocation; provided, however, that such personnel and individuals shall avoid interfering with the rights of private property owners and shall vacate such private property upon request of any owner thereof.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-3-38

, enacted by Ga. L. 2017, p. 416, § 1/HB 251.